Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-309
Nebraska Arts Council; created; members; appointment.

There is hereby created the Nebraska Arts Council to consist of fifteen members to be appointed by the Governor with the approval of the Legislature from among citizens of Nebraska who are known for their professional competence and experience in connection with the arts. In making such appointments, consideration shall be given to recommendations made by representative civic, educational, and professional associations and groups concerned with or engaged in the production or presentation of the arts generally.

Laws 1973, LB 121, § 1.